vi: Phương pháp mở khóa thiết bị chống trộm: Tự động (rảnh tay); Sinh trắc học; Mật mã / vòng xoay; Chìa khóa; Bàn phím / mã PIN; RFID / thẻ từ khoảng cách gần; Chìa khóa từ xa; Ứng dụng trên điện thoại thông minh; Khác
pt-BR: Imobilizador método de desbloqueio: Automático (hands-free); Biométrico; Combinação/mostrador; Chave; Teclado/PIN; RFID/tag de proximidade; Controle remoto; App para smartphone; Outro
sv: Metod för upplåsning av startspärr: Automatisk (handsfree); Biometrisk; Kombination/ratt; Nyckel; Knappsats/PIN-kod; RFID/närhetstagg; Fjärrnyckel; Smartphone-app; Övrigt
ro-RO: Metoda de deblocare a imobilizatorului: Automat (hands-free); Biometric; Combinație / cadran; Cheie; Tastatură / PIN; RFID / etichetă de proximitate; Telecomandă; Aplicație pentru smartphone; Altele
cs: Způsob odemknutí imobilizéru: Automatické (hands-free); Biometrické; Kombinace / číselník; Klíč; Klávesnice / PIN; RFID / bezkontaktní čip; Dálkový ovladač; Aplikace pro chytré telefony; Ostatní
th: วิธีการปลดล็อคระบบกันขโมย: อัตโนมัติ (แฮนด์ฟรี); ไบโอเมตริก; รหัสผสม / แป้นหมุน; กุญแจ; ปุ่มกด / PIN; RFID / แท็กไร้สาย; รีโมทฟอบ; แอปสมาร์ทโฟน; อื่นๆ
es: Método de desbloqueo del inmovilizador: Automático (manos libres); Biométrico; Combinación/dial; Llave; Teclado/PIN; RFID/etiqueta de proximidad; Mando a distancia; Aplicación de smartphone; Otro
de: Methode zum Entsperren der Wegfahrsperre: Automatisch (Hands-free); Biometrisch; Zahlenkombination/Wählrad; Schlüssel; Tastenfeld/PIN; RFID/Proximity-Tag; Fernbedienung; Smartphone-App; Sonstiges
it: Metodo di sblocco dell'immobilizzatore: Automatico (senza mani); Biometrico; Combinazione/quadrante; Chiave; Tastierino/PIN; Tag RFID/di prossimità; Telecomando; App per smartphone; Altro
el: Μέθοδος ξεκλειδώματος του συστήματος ακινητοποίησης: Αυτόματο (hands-free); Βιομετρικό; Συνδυασμός / περιστροφικός επιλογέας; Κλειδί; Πληκτρολόγιο / PIN; Ετικέτα RFID / εγγύτητας; Τηλεχειριστήριο; Εφαρμογή smartphone; Άλλο
tr: İmmobilizer kilidini açma yöntemi: Otomatik (eller serbest); Biyometrik; Şifre / kadran; Anahtar; Tuş takımı / PIN; RFID / yakınlık etiketi; Uzaktan kumandalı anahtar; Akıllı telefon uygulaması; Diğer
fi: Ajonestolaitteen lukituksen avausmenetelmä: Automaattinen (hands-free); Biometrinen; Yhdistelmä / valitsin; Avain; Näppäimistö / PIN-koodi; RFID-/etäisyystunniste; Kaukosäädin; Älypuhelinsovellus; Muu
bg-BG: Метод за отключване на имобилайзера: Автоматично (без ръце); Биометрично; Комбинация/набиране; Ключ; Клавиатура/ПИН код; RFID/таг за близост; Дистанционно управление; Приложение за смартфон; Други
pl: Metoda odblokowania immobilizera: Automatyczne (bezdotykowo); Biometryczne; Szyfr / pokrętło; Klucz; Klawiatura / kod PIN; RFID / brelok zbliżeniowy; Pilot zdalnego sterowania; Aplikacja na smartfona; Inne
lt-LT: Imobilizatoriaus atrakinimo metodas: Automatinis (laisvų rankų); Biometrinis; Kombinuotas / rinkimo ratukas; Raktas; Klaviatūra / PIN; RFID / artumo žyma; Nuotolinio valdymo pultelis; Išmaniojo telefono programėlė; Kita
ja: イモビライザーのロック解除方法: 自動 (ハンズフリー); 生体認証; ダイヤル/暗証番号; キー; キーパッド / PIN; RFID / 近接タグ; リモートフォブ; スマートフォンアプリ; その他
sk-SK: Metóda odomknutia imobilizéra: Automatické (hands-free); Biometrické; Kombinačné / otočný číselník; Kľúč; Klávesnica / PIN; RFID / bezkontaktný štítok; Diaľkový ovládač; Aplikácia v smartfóne; Iné
da: Oplåsningsmetode for startspærre: Automatisk (håndfri); Biometrisk; Kombination / drejeskive; Nøgle; Tastatur / pinkode; RFID / nærhedsbrik; Fjernbetjening; Smartphone-app; Andet
hu: Indításgátló feloldási módja: Automatikus (érintésmentes); Biometrikus; Kombinációs / tárcsás; Kulcs; Számbillentyűzet / PIN-kód; RFID / közelítőkártya; Távirányító; Okostelefon-alkalmazás; Egyéb
nl: Startonderbreker ontgrendelingsmethode: Automatisch (handsfree); Biometrisch; Combinatie / draaischijf; Sleutel; Toetsenpaneel / pincode; RFID / proximity-tag; Afstandsbediening; Smartphone-app; Overig
pt-PT: método de desbloqueio do imobilizador: Automático (mãos-livres); Biométrico; Combinação/mostrador; Chave; Teclado/PIN; RFID/etiqueta de proximidade; Comando à distância; App para smartphone; Outro
hr-HR: Metoda otključavanja imobilizatora: Automatski (hands-free); Biometrijski; Kombinacija / brojčanik; Ključ; Tipkovnica / PIN; RFID / proximity oznaka; Daljinski upravljač; Aplikacija za pametni telefon; Ostalo
en: Immobilizer unlock method: Automatic (hands-free); Biometric; Combination / dial; Key; Keypad / PIN; RFID / proximity tag; Remote fob; Smartphone app; Other
zh-CN: 防盗器解锁方式: 自动 (免触控); 生物识别; 密码组合/拨号; 钥匙; 键盘/PIN 码; RFID/感应标签; 遥控钥匙扣; 智能手机应用; 其他
ru: Способ разблокировки иммобилайзера: Автоматически (без рук); Биометрический; Кодовый замок / наборный; Ключ; Клавиатура / PIN-код; RFID / метка присутствия; Брелок ДУ; Приложение для смартфона; Другое
ko: 이모빌라이저 잠금 해제 방법: 자동(핸즈프리); 생체 인식; 콤비네이션/다이얼; 키; 키패드/PIN; RFID/근접 태그; 원격 포브; 스마트폰 앱; 기타
sl-SI: Način odklenitve blokade motorja: Samodejno (prostoročno); Biometrično; Kombinacija/številčnica; Ključ; Tipkovnica/koda PIN; RFID/oznaka bližine; Daljinski obesek; Aplikacija za pametni telefon; Drugo
zh-TW: 防盜裝置解鎖方式: 自動 (免持); 生物辨識; 密碼鎖 / 轉盤; 鑰匙; 鍵盤 / PIN 碼; RFID / 感應磁扣; 遙控鑰匙; 智慧型手機 App; 其他
fr: Mode de déverrouillage de l’antidémarrage: Automatique (mains libres); Biométrique; Combinaison/cadran; Clé; Clavier/code PIN; Étiquette RFID/de proximité; Télécommande; Application pour smartphone; Autre
nb: Metode for opplåsing av startsperre: Automatisk (håndfri); Biometrisk; Kombinasjon / skive; Nøkkel; Tastatur / PIN-kode; RFID / nærbrikke; Fjernkontroll; Smarttelefon-app; Annet